District of Columbia statutes.
16-315

Prior proceedings.

The provisions of this chapter have no effect prior to June 8, 1954, except to the extent that they specifically so provide. They do not affect in any way the rights and relations obtained by any decree of adoption entered prior to June 8, 1954.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 542, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
1981 Ed., § 16-315.
1973 Ed., § 16-315.